Hawaii statutes.
§190D-33 Revenues. The revenues
obtained from the leasing of state marine waters pursuant to this chapter shall
be deposited into the special land and development fund to be used for
planning, research, and development of the aquaculture industry; provided that
the portion of revenues subject to chapter 10, shall be deposited into the
public land trust fund as provided by law. [L 1986, c 91, pt of §1; am L 1999,
c 176, §§9, 11; am L 2002, c 203, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next